Illinois, session 104th, SB2684.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Sections 143.10f and 143.10g as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/143.10f new)7    Sec. 143.10f. Home property insurance; premiums and 8notice. 9    (a) No insurance company that is authorized to do business 10in this State and that issues policies for personal multiperil 11property coverage, commonly known as homeowners insurance, 12shall use premiums collected from policyholders for the 13following:14        (1) executive employee compensation and bonuses, 15    including, but not limited to, Chief Executive Officer 16    stock buy-backs;17        (2) any marketing materials, including, but not 18    limited to, any print, radio, television, electronic, or 19    digital advertisements;20        (3) costs associated with lobbying; and21        (4) contributions to State candidates for elected 22    office, federal candidates for elected office, or 23    political committees.  SB2684- 2 -LRB104 14538 BAB 27679 b1    (b) If an insurer that issues homeowner insurance policies 2in this State cancels or refuses to renew a policyholder's 3insurance policy or if, upon renewal, a policyholder's premium 4will increase by 10% or more, the insurer shall automatically 5provide a written notice to the policyholder disclosing the 6causes of any policy cancellation, non-renewal, or premium 7increase.8    (c) The notice required under this Section shall be 9provided to a policyholder no less than 60 calendar days 10before the effective date of the renewal, cancellation, or 11expiration of the policy. The notice shall include a 12reasonable explanation for and the primary factors 13contributing to any premium increase, non-renewal, or 14cancellation. The primary factors shall include the following 15categories:16        (1) specific risk factors;17        (2) claims history;18        (3) market conditions;19        (4) a summary of any changes to policy terms, 20    conditions, or coverage; and21        (5) a clear and concise breakdown of the premium 22    calculation that identifies any administrative costs, loss 23    reserves, reinsurance costs, and claims-related factors 24    specific to the insured property.25    The notice shall include the extent to which each of the 26categories in this subsection (c) contributes to the premium   SB2684- 3 -LRB104 14538 BAB 27679 b1increase.2    (d) An insurer shall include a statement in a notice 3provided under this Section that a policyholder may contact 4the insurer to request additional information about the 5policyholder's premium increase. The insurer shall respond to 6and provide additional information for the policyholder's 7subsequent requests for premium change transparency no more 8than 15 calendar days from the receipt of any request.9    (e) An insurer shall send the notice to a policyholder in 10writing and may send either explanations or notices via postal 11mail or electronic mail if the policyholder has consented to 12receive notifications electronically.13    (f) An insurer shall, within a reasonable time after 14providing notice to a policyholder, file electronically with 15the Department of Insurance a copy of the notice and any 16supporting documentation provided to the policyholder under 17this Section. An insurer's failure to send the notice required 18by this Section to the policyholder or file a copy with the 19Department of Insurance is a violation of this Section. 20    (215 ILCS 5/143.10g new)21    Sec. 143.10g. Homeowners and renters insurance 22affordability assistance pilot program. 23    (a) As used in this Section:24    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 25Opportunity.   SB2684- 4 -LRB104 14538 BAB 27679 b1    "Eligible policyholder" means a homeowner or renter who 2can demonstrate:3        (1) an increase of at least 20% in homeowners 4    insurance or renters insurance premiums compared to the 5    immediately preceding policy period; and6        (2) meeting financial hardship criteria that includes, 7    at a minimum:8            (A) household income at or below 80% of the area 9        median income as determined by the United States 10        Department of Housing and Urban Development;11            (B) recent unemployment or loss of significant 12        income;13            (C) high debt-to-income ratio or other 14        extraordinary circumstances; or15            (D) fixed-income status, including seniors or 16        others relying on pension income, social security 17        benefits, or similar income sources.18    "Financial assistance" means a one-time assistance grant 19of up to $5,000 per household or a maximum of 50% of the 20insurance premium increase, whichever is less.21    (b) Subject to appropriation, on or before July 1, 2026, 22the Department shall establish a homeowners and renters 23insurance affordability assistance pilot program for eligible 24policyholders to receive financial assistance. The pilot 25program shall provide direct financial assistance to eligible 26homeowners and renters to offset unexpected increases in   SB2684- 5 -LRB104 14538 BAB 27679 b1homeowners insurance and renters insurance premiums.2    (c) The Department shall submit an annual report with its 3recommendations and findings beginning July 1, 2027, including 4at least the following information: 5        (1) the number of pilot program applicants and 6    recipients;7        (2) total funds disbursed; and8        (3) recommendations for extending or modifying the 9    program.10    (d) The Department may establish rules, as needed, to 11implement the procedures and requirements for this pilot 12program.13    (e) This Section is repealed on July 1, 2030.